ja: ラインストーン設定タイプ: ベゼル; セッティングなし（縫い付けストーン）; プロング; リム付き; その他
es: Tipo de engaste de diamantes de imitación: Bisel; Sin engaste (piedra para coser); Engaste de garra; Con reborde; Otro
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης στρας: Καστόνι (Bezel); Χωρίς δέσιμο (πέτρα για ράψιμο); Με δόντια (Prong); Με περίγραμμα (Rimmed); Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta nameščanja kristalčkov: Okovje; Brez okovja (kamenček za prišitje); S krempeljci; Z robom; Drugo
zh-CN: 水钻镶座类型: 包边; 无底座（可缝水钻）; 爪镶; 包边底座; 其他
nl: Strass zettingstype: Zetkast; Geen zetting (opnaaisteen); Klauw; Met rand; Overig
pt-PT: Tipo de cravação do strass: Bisel; Sem engaste (pedra de coser); Garra; Com rebordo; Outro
de: Fassungsart des Strasssteins: Zargenfassung; Keine Fassung (Stein zum Aufnähen); Krappenfassung; Umrandet; Sonstiges
sv: Typ av infattning för strass: Infattning; Ingen fattning (påsybar sten); Klofattning; Kantfattning; Annat
it: Tipo di impostazioni dello strass: A castone; Senza incastonatura (pietra da cucire); A griffe; Con bordo; Altro
hu: Strasszkő foglalattípusa: Tokos; Foglalat nélkül (felvarrható kő); Karmos; Peremes; Egyéb
vi: Kiểu gắn đá giả kim cương: Viền bọc (Bezel); Không có đế (đá khâu qua lỗ); Ngàm giữ (Prong); Bọc viền kim loại; Khác
ru: Тип закрепки страза: Глухая закрепка; Без оправы (пришивной камень); Крапановая закрепка; С ободком; Другое
sk-SK: Typ nastavenia kamienka: Obruba; Bez osadenia (našité kamienky); Krapňové; Lemované; Iné
ko: 라인스톤 세팅 유형: 베젤; 세팅 없음(봉제용 스톤); 프롱; 림 처리; 기타
th: ประเภทการตั้งค่าพลอยเทียม: ฝังหุ้ม; ไม่มีการฝัง (คริสตัลแบบเย็บติด); ฝังหนามเตย; มีขอบ; อื่นๆ
en: Rhinestone setting type: Bezel; No setting (sew-through stone); Prong; Rimmed; Other
pt-BR: Strass tipo de engaste: Bisel; Sem engaste (pedra para costura); Garra; Com borda; Outro
cs: Typ upevnění štrasových kamenů: Obruba; Bez osazení (našívací kamínek); Krapen; Lemované; Jiné
lt-LT: Akutės tvirtinimo tipas: Rėmelis; Be įtvaro (prisiuvamas akmuo); Danteliai; Su apvadu; Kita
ro-RO: Tip de montură a strasului: Casetă; Fără montură (piatră de cusut); Gheare; Cu margine; Altele
nb: Innfatningstype for rhinstein: Sargfatning; Ingen innfatning (gjennomsydd stein); Klofatning; Innrammet; Annet
fr: Type de sertissage du strass: Serti clos; Sans sertissage (pierre à coudre); À griffes; Bordé; Autre
bg-BG: Начин на закрепване на кристалите: Каст (обков); Без обков (камък за пришиване); Зъбци (крачета); С рамка; Други
hr-HR: Vrsta postavki kristala: Okvir; Bez okvira (kamen za ušivanje); Zubac; S rubom; Ostalo
tr: Yapay elmas montaj tipi: Bezel; Yuvasız (dikilebilir taş); Tırnaklı; Çerçeveli; Diğer
zh-TW: 水鑽鑲嵌類型: 包鑲; 無底座 (可縫綴水鑽); 爪鑲; 框鑲; 其他
fi: Tekojalokiven asetuksen tyyppi: Kehysistukka; Ei istukkaa (läpiommeltava kivi); Kynsi-istukka; Reunustettu; Muu
pl: Typ ustawień kryształu górskiego: Oprawa pełna; Brak oprawy (kamień do przyszycia); Oprawa pazurkowa; Z obwódką; Inne
da: Rhinstens indfatningstype: Bezel; Ingen indfatning (sten til påsyning); Grabber; Med kant; Andet